src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-1Y-kaarryd_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kaarrâd: # Verb 'bend with a bow/kaaristaa' - full paradigm
     kaarrâd+V+Inf: kaarrâd
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaaram
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kaarak
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: käärr
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kaarrâp
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kaarrveʹted
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: käʹrre
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: kaarât
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kaar
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kaʹrrem
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kaʹrriǩ
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaari
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kaarim, kaarin]
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaarid
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kaʹrre
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: kaʹrreš
     kaarrâd+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kaarrâm
     kaarrâd+V+Pot+Sg1: kaaržem
     kaarrâd+V+Pot+Sg2: kaaržiǩ
     kaarrâd+V+Pot+Sg3: kaarâž
     kaarrâd+V+Pot+Pl1: kaaržep
     kaarrâd+V+Pot+Pl2: kaaržid
     kaarrâd+V+Pot+Pl3: kaarže
     kaarrâd+V+Pot+Sg4: kaaržet
     kaarrâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: kaarže
     kaarrâd+V+Cond+Sg1: kaarčem
     kaarrâd+V+Cond+Sg2: kaarčiǩ
     kaarrâd+V+Cond+Sg3: kaarči
     kaarrâd+V+Cond+Pl1: kaarčim
     kaarrâd+V+Cond+Pl2: kaarčid
     kaarrâd+V+Cond+Pl3: kaarče
     kaarrâd+V+Cond+Sg4: kaarčeš
     kaarrâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: kaarče
     kaarrâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: kaar
     kaarrâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: kaaras
     kaarrâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: kaarrâp
     kaarrâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: kaarrâd
     kaarrâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: kärraz
     kaarrâd+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kaar
     kaarrâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII: karru
     kaarrâd+V+Actio+Ess: kaarrmen
     kaarrâd+V+Actio: kaarrâm
     kaarrâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: kaarri
     kaarrâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: kaarrâm
     kaarrâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: karrum
     kaarrâd+V+VAbess: kaarǩâni
     kaarrâd+V+Ger+Ess: kaareen
     kaarrâd+V+Ger+Instr: kaareeʹl
     kaarrâd+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: karškuẹʹtted
